Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-4-120.
Exemption of rights and benefits from state and local taxes and from legal process; restriction on assignability.

The right to a retirement benefit, return of contributions, any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter shall be exempt from any state, county, or municipal tax, except as provided in Code Section 48-7-27; exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and unassignable, except as otherwise specifically provided for in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 20; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 4.

47-4-121.
Attempts to defraud the retirement system by means of false statements or falsified records; adjustment of erroneous payments.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or falsifies or permits to be falsified any records of the retirement system in any attempt to defraud the retirement system, as a result of such act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500.00 or imprisonment not exceeding 12 months or both.

If any change or error in the records results in any member or beneficiary receiving from the retirement system more or less than he would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments as far as practicable and in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, §§ 21, 22.